Florida, session 2026, SB758.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 8 9 Section 1.âSubsection (2) of section 43.16, Florida 10 Statutes, is amended to read: 11 43.16âJustice Administrative Commission; membership, powers 12 and duties.â 13 (2)âMembers of the Justice Administrative Commission shall 14 serve for a period of 2 years, with the terms of each dating 15 from July 1, 1985, except that initially, one state attorney 16 member and one public defender member shall each serve a 1-year 17 term. Members shall be selected in the following manner: 18 (a)âThree Two state attorneys, to be appointed by the 19 president of the Florida Prosecuting Attorneys Association. 20 (b)âTwo public defenders, to be appointed by the president 21 of the Florida Public Defender Association. 22 (c)âOne criminal defense attorney who is not employed by 23 the government and who has contracted with the commission to 24 provide services pursuant to s. 27.40 within the 5 years 25 preceding his or her appointment, to be appointed by the 26 president of The Florida Bar Board of Governors. 27 (d)âOne circuit judge, or senior judge serving on a circuit 28 court, to be appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme 29 Court. 30 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.